Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-197, to read: START_STATUTE41-197. Nuisance actions; consumer fraud actions; damages; civil penalty A. If the attorney general files a public nuisance action or a consumer fraud action, the attorney general is liable for damages to any person who is injured by the action if both of the following apply: 1. The nuisance action or consumer fraud action is either: (a) Dismissed by the court. (b) Found to not have merit. 2. The attorney general either: (a) Knew or should have known that the nuisance action or consumer fraud action lacked a sufficient legal or factual basis. (b) publicized the filing of the nuisance action or consumer fraud action. B. Damages that are awarded under this section shall include reasonable attorney fees and the costs of the litigation.  The attorney general shall pay a civil penalty that is three times the amount of any damages that the defendant has suffered as a result of the nuisance action or consumer fraud action.  If the defendant is a business, the damages may include lost sales and business, lost profits and loss in value of the business. C. The attorney general shall pay any damages and civil penalty awarded under this section from monies in the attorney general's general operating fund. END_STATUTE